Georgia, session 2025_26, SB35.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Code Section 33-24-46 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to cancellation
or nonrenewal of certain property insurance policies, is amended by revising paragraph (1)
of subsection (d) as follows:
"(d)(1) No insurer shall refuse to renew a policy to which this Code section applies
unless a written notice of nonrenewal is mailed or delivered in person to the named
insured. Such notice stating the time when nonrenewal will be effective, which shall not
be less than 30 60 days from the date of mailing or delivery of such notice of nonrenewal
or such longer period as may be provided in the contract or by statute, shall be delivered
as provided in subsection (d) of Code Section 33-24-14, in person, or by depositing the
S. B. 35
- 1 -

LC 46 1059S (SCS)
notice in the United States mail to be dispatched by at least first-class mail to the last
address of record of the insured and of the lienholder, where applicable, and receiving the
receipt provided by the United States Postal Service or such other evidence of mailing as
prescribed or accepted by the United States Postal Service. The insurer shall provide the
reason or reasons for nonrenewal as required by Chapter 39 of this title."
SECTION 2.
This Act shall become effective on January 1, 2026, and shall apply to all policies issued,
delivered, issued for delivery, or renewed in this state on or after such date.
SECTION 3.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
S. B. 35
- 2 -